Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.810

Title not applicable to individual providers, family child care providers, adult family home providers, and language access providers.

Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, and family child care providers, adult family home providers, and language access providers, all as defined in RCW 41.56.030, are not employees of the state or any of its political subdivisions and are specifically and entirely excluded from all provisions of this title, except as provided in RCW 74.39A.270, 41.56.028, and 41.56.029.

[ 2010 c 296 s 5; 2007 c 184 s 4; 2006 c 54 s 4; 2004 c 3 s 3.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2010 c 296: See note following RCW 41.56.510.

Part headings not law—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 184: See notes following RCW 41.56.029.

Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2006 c 54: See RCW 41.56.913 through 41.56.915.

Severability—Effective date—2004 c 3: See notes following RCW 74.39A.270.